Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 208 Juvenile Proceedings — Commitment and Care of
Children [Repealed]

208.010.
Definitions for KRS 208.010 to 208.540 and 208.990. [Repealed.]

208.020.
Jurisdiction of juvenile court — Causing child to become delinquent, neglected, needy, dependent — Jury trial. [Repealed.]

208.030.
Juvenile record — Juvenile docket. [Repealed.]

208.040.
Clerk and stenographer for juvenile court — Compensation. [Repealed.]

208.050.
Special courtroom for juvenile court. [Repealed.]

208.060.
Conduct of hearing. [Repealed.]

208.065.
Right to counsel in cases involving sentence resulting in detention. [Repealed.]

208.070.
Preliminary inquiry. [Repealed.]

208.080.
Issuance of summons and notice — Temporary custody of child. [Repealed.]

208.083.
Mandatory examinations for children in temporary placement. [Repealed.]

208.090.
Method of serving summons and notice. [Repealed.]

208.100.
Enforcement of summons — Warrant. [Repealed.]

208.110.
Law of arrest applicable to children. [Repealed.]

208.120.
Child not to be detained in police station, lockup, jail or prison — Exception. [Repealed.]

208.130.
Detention facilities — Agreements for use of state reception-diagnostic centers. [Repealed.]

208.140.
Investigation before disposition of case. [Repealed.]

208.150.
Examination of child found to be mentally ill or defective. [Repealed.]

208.160.
Physical examination and disposition of child not in normal health. [Repealed.]

208.170.
Proceedings against children suspected of felony. [Repealed.]

208.180.
Disposition of child convicted of felony or misdemeanor. [Repealed.]

208.190.
Decree in proceedings concerning children who are charged with crime. [Repealed.]

208.192.
Detention of hearing — Right to counsel. [Repealed.]

208.194.
Adjudication of felony offense — Institutionalization — Shock probation. [Repealed.]

208.196.
Physical evidence — How obtained and utilized — Disposition. [Repealed.]

208.198.
Notification of disposition and placement of child. [Repealed.]

208.200.
Probation or commitment of child convicted of public offense. [Repealed.]

208.205.
Modification or termination of order of commitment, protective supervision, or probation. [Repealed.]

208.210.
Disposition of child not having committed public offense. [Repealed.]

208.220.
Department for human resources may assist juvenile courts in placing children — County contributions. [Repealed.]

208.230.
Court may coerce cooperation of parents or other persons in support of order or decree. [Repealed.]

208.235.
Bond of parent or guardian of delinquent child, required when — Conditions — Forfeiture. [Repealed.]

208.240.
Restitution or reparation by child committing public offense. [Repealed.]

208.250.
Religious faith of parents to be considered in placing child in home or committing to an institution or agency. [Repealed.]

208.260.
Girls to be accompanied by woman attendant or relative — Reports of violations. [Repealed.]

208.270.
Commitment order and information to be furnished department. [Repealed.]

208.275.
Unconditional release from custody of department — Expungement of record — Penalty. [Repealed.]

208.280.
Parents or estate to contribute to support and education of child when able. [Repealed.]

208.290.
Annual reports by county clerks. [Repealed.]

208.300.
Reports by persons in charge of homes or institutions to which a child is probated — Power of department to make visitations and inspections. [Repealed.]

208.310.
Advisory boards of juvenile courts. [Repealed.]

208.320.
Chief probation officers and assistants in county having city of first or second class or urban-county government — Volunteer probation officers. [Repealed.]

208.330.
Duties of probation officers. [Repealed.]

208.335.
Duties of court appointed special advocates. [Repealed.]

208.340.
Information obtained by probation officers confidential — Exception. [Repealed.]

208.350.
Use of evidence in subsequent actions prohibited. [Repealed.]

208.360.
Tax levies and appropriations by cities and counties for purposes of KRS 208.010 to 208.540. [Repealed.]

208.370.
Fees allowed in juvenile court proceedings. [Repealed.]

208.380.
Appeals. [Repealed.]

208.390.
Conformity of existing probations and pending proceedings concerning juveniles to provisions of KRS 208.010 to 208.540. [Repealed.]

208.400.
Duties of department concerning existing institutions and development of additional facilities. [Repealed.]

208.403.
Rehabilitation center for delinquent girls constructed by women’s clubs, powers of department. [Repealed.]

208.410.
Program of care, treatment and rehabilitation of children committed to department. [Repealed.]

208.420.
Regional reception-diagnostic centers. [Repealed.]

208.430.
Powers of cabinet during period of commitment. [Repealed.]

208.440.
Receipt and disbursement of funds for board, lodging and care of children on probation. [Repealed.]

208.450.
Medical and surgical care for children committed to cabinet. [Repealed.]

208.460.
Disposition of mentally ill or retarded child committed to cabinet. [Repealed.]

208.470.
Disposition of child incapable of benefiting from treatment of cabinet facilities. [Repealed.]

208.480.
Disposition of children committed to youth authority. [Repealed.]

208.490.
Transfer of children confined in reformatory or penitentiary to custody and jurisdiction of department. [Repealed.]

208.500.
Children paroled by youth authority exempt from responsibility or authority of division of probation and parole. [Repealed.]

208.510.
Violation of supervised placement conditions. [Repealed.]

208.520.
Design and operation of institutional facilities — Vocational education — Employment of children — Use or disposal of farm or other products. [Repealed.]

208.530.
Education of children in institutions. [Repealed.]

208.540.
Mileage and expense allowance to officer conveying child to institution or facility. [Repealed.]

208.550.
Method of acquiring lands and buildings. [Repealed.]

208.555.
Kentucky conference of juvenile court judges, purpose — Sponsorship — Expenses. [Repealed.]

208.560.
Youth Authority, organization, staff and personnel — Director — Governing board. [Repealed.]

208.570.
Powers and duties of director. [Repealed.]

208.580.
Powers and duties of governing board. [Repealed.]

208.590.
Youth Authority is division of Children’s Bureau within the Department of Welfare — Executive Director. [Repealed.]

208.595.
Transfer of Child Welfare Division from Department of Economic Security to Kentucky Children’s Bureau. [Repealed.]